New Jersey, session 221, S3775.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the court may exercise its discretion to adjust, reduce, or waive any mandatory fines, fees, penalties, assessments, or other legal financial obligations imposed on a defendant in a criminal proceeding, including a non-indictable criminal proceeding, based on the defendants inability to pay, the interests of justice, or if the fine, fee, penalty, assessment, or other legal financial obligation would be contrary to the purposes of rehabilitation. The court shall state, on the record, the factors that resulted in the adjustment, reduction, or waiver of mandatory fines, fees, penalties, assessments, or other legal financial obligations. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.